Maryland, session 2026, HB1150.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That Sections(s) 13–5301 through 13–5303 and the subtitle “Subtitle 53. Nonoccupational
Postexposure Prophylaxis (nPEP) Standing Order Program” of Article – Health – General
of the Annotated Code of Maryland be repealed.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – Health Occupations
12–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(x) (1) “Practice pharmacy” means to engage in any of the following activities:
(i) Providing pharmaceutical care;
(ii) Compounding, dispensing, or distributing prescription drugs or
devices;
(iii) Compounding or dispensing nonprescription drugs or devices;
(iv) Monitoring prescriptions for prescription and nonprescription
drugs or devices;
(v) Providing information, explanation, or recommendations to
patients and health care practitioners about the safe and effective use of prescription or
nonprescription drugs or devices;
(vi) Identifying and appraising problems concerning the use or
monitoring of therapy with drugs or devices;

HOUSE BILL 1150 3
(vii) Acting within the parameters of a therapy management contract,
as provided under Subtitle 6A of this title;
(viii) Administering vaccinations in accordance with § 12–508 of this
title or self–administered drugs or maintenance injectable medications in accordance with
§ 12–509 of this title;
(ix) Delegating a pharmacy act to a registered pharmacy technician,
pharmacy student, or an individual engaged in a Board approved pharmacy technician
training program;
(x) Supervising a delegated pharmacy act performed by a registered
pharmacy technician, pharmacy student, or an individual engaged in a Board approved
pharmacy technician training program;
(xi) Providing drug therapy management in accordance with §
19–713.6 of the Health – General Article;
(xii) Prescribing and dispensing contraceptive medications and
self–administered contraceptive devices approved by the U.S. Food and Drug
Administration;
(xiii) Prescribing and dispensing nicotine replacement therapy
medications; [or
(xiv) If the pharmacist is registered with the Nonoccupational
Postexposure Prophylaxis (nPEP) Standing Order Program established under § 13–5302 of
the Health – General Article, dispensing nonoccupational postexposure prophylaxis (nPEP)
medication approved by the U.S. Food and Drug Administration and in accordance with
“Updated Guidelines for Antiretroviral Postexposure Prophylaxis After Sexual, Injection
Drug Use, or Other Nonoccupational Exposure to HIV – United States 2016” or subsequent
guidelines published by the federal Centers for Disease Control and Prevention]
(XIV) IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 12–515 OF THIS TITLE,
PRESCRIBING DRUGS OR DEVICES, EXCLUDING CONTROLLED SUBSTANCES, THAT
ARE PRESCRIBED:
1. IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE PRODUCT’S U.S. FOOD
AND DRUG ADMINISTRATION–APPROVED LABELING; AND
2. TO TREAT CONDITIONS THAT:
A. DO NOT REQUIRE A NEW DIAGNOSIS;
B. ARE MINOR AND GENERALLY SELF–LIMITING; OR

HOUSE BILL 1150
C. HAVE HAVE A TEST THAT IS USED TO GUIDE
DIAGNOSIS OR CLINICAL DECISION MAKING THAT IS CLASSIFIED AS WAIVED UNDER
THE FEDERAL CLINICAL LABORATORY IMPROVEMENT AMENDMENTS OF 1988; OR
(XV) IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 12–516 OF THIS TITLE:
1. PERFORMING AND INTERPRETING LABORATORY
TESTS FOR HUMAN IMMUNODEFICIENCY VIRUS; AND
2. PRESCRIBING AND DISPENSING PRE–EXPOSURE
PROPHYLAXIS AND POSTEXPOSURE PROPHYLAXIS MEDICATIONS.
(2) “Practice pharmacy” does not include the operations of a person who
holds a permit issued under § 12–6C–03 of this title.
12–515.
(A) IN ACCORDANCE WITH A STATEWIDE WRITTEN PROTOCOL ESTABLISHED
BY THE STATE BOARD OF PHARMACY, A PHARMACIST MAY ORDER A TEST FOR, TEST
FOR, SCREEN FOR, AND TREAT MINOR CONDITIONS, INCLUDING:
(1) COLD SORES;
(2) GROUP A STREPTOCOCCUS PHARYNGITIS;
(3) (2) INFLUENZA;
(4) LICE;
(5) (3) COVID–19 AND OTHER RESPIRATORY ILLNESSES,
CONDITIONS, OR DISEASES;
(6) (4) SKIN CONDITIONS, INCLUDING RINGWORM AND ATHLETE’S
ATHLETE’S FOOT; AND
(7) URINARY TRACT INFECTION; AND
(8) (5) OTHER EMERGING AND EXISTING PUBLIC HEALTH THREATS
IDENTIFIED BY THE DEPARTMENT, IF AUTHORIZED BY AN ORDER, A RULE, OR A
REGULATION.
(B) (1) A PHARMACIST WHO ORDERS A TEST FOR, TESTS FOR, SCREENS
FOR, OR TREATS A HEALTH CONDITION UNDER THIS SECTION MAY USE ANY TEST

HOUSE BILL 1150 5
THAT MAY GUIDE CLINICAL DECISION MAKING THAT IS CLASSIFIED AS WAIVED
UNDER THE FEDERAL CLINICAL LABORATORY IMPROVEMENT AMENDMENTS OF
1988, THE FEDERAL RULES ADOPTED UNDER THE FEDERAL CLINICAL LABORATORY
IMPROVEMENT AMENDMENTS OF 1988, OR ANY SCREENING PROCEDURE THAT IS
ESTABLISHED BY STATEWIDE WRITTEN PROTOCOL.
(2) A TEST PERFORMED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION DOES NOT
REQUIRE A LETTER OF EXCEPTION FROM THE DEPARTMENT.
(C) A PHARMACIST MAY DELEGATE THE ADMINISTRATIVE AND TECHNICAL
TASKS OF PERFORMING A TEST CLASSIFIED AS WAIVED UNDER THE FEDERAL
CLINICAL LABORATORY IMPROVEMENT AMENDMENTS OF 1988 TO:
(1) A REGISTERED PHARMACY TECHNICIAN; OR
(2) A PHARMACY STUDENT; OR
(3) AN INDIVIDUAL ENGAGED IN A BOARD–APPROVED PHARMACY
TECHNICIAN TRAINING PROGRAM UNDER THE SUPERVISION OF THE PHARMACIST
REGISTERED PHARMACY INTERN.
12–516.
(A) THE DEPARTMENT MAY ESTABLISH A STATEWIDE WRITTEN PROTOCOL
FOR THE DELIVERY OF PRE–EXPOSURE PROPHYLAXIS AND POSTEXPOSURE
PROPHYLAXIS MEDICATIONS FOR THE PREVENTION AND TREATMENT OF HUMAN
IMMUNODEFICIENCY VIRUS.
(B) IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE STATEWIDE WRITTEN PROTOCOL
ESTABLISHED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION, A PHARMACIST MAY:
(1) PERFORM AND INTERPRET LABORATORY TESTS;
(2) CONDUCT ASSESSMENTS AND CONSULTATIONS;
(3) INITIATE, DISPENSE, OR ADMINISTER:
(I) PRE–EXPOSURE PROPHYLAXIS MEDICATIONS; OR
(II) POSTEXPOSURE PROPHYLAXIS MEDICATIONS; AND
(4) PROVIDE REFERRALS FOR ADDITIONAL CARE.

HOUSE BILL 1150
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.